District of Columbia statutes.
21-181

Enlistment of indigent minor children.

The Probate Court may appoint guardians to indigent minor children for the purpose of securing their enlistment in the naval or marine service of the United States, as provided by law, free of costs on account of the proceeding.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 31(a)(2), (3), 23 DCR 2544
1981 Ed., § 21-181.
1973 Ed., § 21-181.